Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 63 Military Property
12-63-410. Canteen — Conditional termination.

If the Adjutant General deems it to be in the best interest of the military forces of this state or of the United States, the Adjutant General may enter into an agreement or agreements with the Army and Air Force Exchange Service for the institution, maintenance, and operation by the Army and Air Force Exchange Service of post exchanges on Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee, or both.

Upon the execution of the agreement or agreements and the institution by the Army and Air Force Exchange Service of a post exchange on Camp Joseph T. Robinson or Fort Chaffee, the operation of the military-style canteen or canteens, as the case may be, by the Adjutant General, as provided in §§ 12-63-404 — 12-63-409 and this section, shall terminate.

The termination of the operation of one (1) or more canteens shall not mandate that other canteens at other locations be closed.

Cross References. Fort Chaffee military service club, §3-4-706.

To the extent there is a conflict between applicable regulations of the United States Air Force pertaining to military service clubs and the laws and regulations of the state, state laws and regulations shall control.

Any military service club established at Ebbing Air National Guard Field shall obtain all requisite state and local permits required for its operation and shall pay any taxes due from its operation to the state and local governments that apply to its operation.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50. § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Code of Military Justice, see Commentaries Volume B.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 211, § 23: Feb. 26, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the removal of officers whoare substandard in performance of duty or in conduct, deficient in character,or unsuited for military service is of paramount importance to the good orderand discipline of the Arkansas National Guard and security of the State ofArkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act beingimmediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “of the code” following “applicability” in the section heading; rewrote (a); and deleted “and courts of inquiry” following “Courts-martial” in (b).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added present (a) and redesignated former (a) as (b)(1) and (b)(2) and former (b) as (c); and substituted “A person convicted under subdivision (b)(1) of this section” for “Upon conviction of that charge, he” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment added “while accounting for the differences in the types of duty status of members of the organized militia” in (a).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning courts of inquiry, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 5.The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 50, § 163; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-674.

Convening authorities may communicate directly with their staff judge advocates or legal officers in matters relating to the administration of military justice, and the staff judge advocate or legal officer of any command may communicate directly with the staff judge advocate or legal officer of a superior or subordinate command or with the State Judge Advocate.

No person who has acted as member, law officer, trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, defense counsel, assistant defense counsel, or investigating officer, or who has been a witness for either the prosecution or defense in any case may later act as staff judge advocate or legal officer to any reviewing authority upon the same case.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a)(1), deleted “on the recommendation of the Adjutant General” preceding “shall appoint” and added “subject to confirmation by the Senate”; and added (a)(3).

The State Judge Advocate and all assistant state judge advocates;

All summary courts-martial;

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, acting adjutants, and personnel adjutants;

All legal officers;

The president, law officer, trial counsel, and assistant trial counsel for all general and special courts-martial;

The president and the counsel for the court of any court of inquiry;

All officers designated to take a disposition;

All persons detailed to conduct an investigation; and

All other persons designated by rules of the Governor.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(9).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning dismissal of commissioned officers, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 6.The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 50, § 49; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-604; Acts 1989, No. 178, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “12-64-107, 12-64-109” for “12-64-107 – 12-64-109”, substituted “12-64-201 – 12-64-203, 12-64-205 – 12-64-207, 12-64-301” for “12-64-201 – 12-64-207”, deleted “12-64-408” preceding “12-64-410”, and substituted “12-64-848” for “12-64-842”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning injury to property, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1003, § 8.The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 50, § 167; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-678.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 489, § 8; 1979, No. 362, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1811; Acts 1997, No. 1201, § 12.

Subchapter 5

— Military Service Clubs

12-63-501. Ebbing Air National Guard Field.

The Adjutant General is authorized to establish and operate a military service club at Ebbing Air National Guard Field.

(1)Any military service club established at Ebbing Air National Guard Field shall be operated at no cost to the State of Arkansas and shall be generally operated in accordance with applicable military regulations of the United States Air Force pertaining to military service clubs, and in accordance with the orders, directions, and general supervision of the Adjutant General.

The laws of the state and the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall apply to the operation of the military service club.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1074, § 1;
2019, No. 315, § 946.

12-63-409. Canteen — Use of funds.